Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB743.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 156.690 is amended to read as follows:
The Kentucky Board of Education shall initiate a program to assist and encourage each
certified teacher to purchase a computer for his or her own personal use. The program
shall include, but not be limited to, the following:
(1) The Kentucky Board of Education shall obtain by competitive bidding or
negotiation the lowest possible purchase prices for various personal computers on
behalf of all interested teachers.
(2) The Kentucky Board of Education shall arrange a suitable training program in the
use of these computers with the vendor awarded the contract.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/19/2025 11:17 AM Jacketed